Utah statutes.
4-9-8.   Sale of commodities in liquid form -- Sale of commodities in nonliquid form -- Requirements.

Commodities in liquid form shall be sold by liquid measure or by weight. Commodities not in liquid form shall be sold only by weight, measure, or by count, so long as the method of sale provides accurate quantity information.

